Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1781
Tax refund; denial; appeal.

The denial, in whole or in part, of a claim for refund shall be considered a final action of the Tax Commissioner. The denial may be appealed, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1987, LB 523, § 40;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 158.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.